Massachusetts, session 194th, S2407.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION I. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
The John A. Volpe Winchester Center Station Memorial Recognition Act
SECTION II – PURPOSE: Memorializing Governor John A. Volpe
John A. Volpe, a remarkable, and important individual in Massachusetts History, lived a
significant portion of his life, particularly most of his public life, in Winchester, Massachusetts,
and should be publicly recognized, within its boundaries. Among his actions, was speaking at the
actual original dedication of the elevated Winchester Center Station, having made the decision,
of 3

for the new format of the station, which has saved numerous uncounted lives, over many
decades.
Among many details, of an energetic, enthusiastic, and committed public life, are known
significant achievements:
• Governor of Massachusetts, for three terms
• United States Secretary of Transportation
• United States Ambassador to Italy
• Construction Contractor
• Navy Seabee
• Winchester Town Meeting Member
• Known National Figure
• Chair, first national commission on drunk driving, and driving safety
• Strong local Charity Interests, And Activities
• A wide range of personal stories, and individual interactions with numerous
people, over his entire life
SECTION III – MEMORIAL DETAILS
A Volpe Memorial Working Group (VMWG) shall be established, with representatives,
of the Town of Winchester, the MBTA, and the Winchester Volpe Memorial Group, to consider
how to carry out, proper memorialization of Governor John A. Volpe; signage, appropriate
of 3

design work, and suitable historical memorial information, in the formal recognition of Governor
John A. Volpe, at or near the Winchester Center Station.
The General Manager (GM) of the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority (MBTA)
shall name a Chair of the Volpe Memorial Working Group (VMWG); and the GM, and the
named Chair, shall assemble a committee of interested individuals, who shall include residents of
the Town of Winchester, and other appropriate individuals, to consider how best to memorialize
Governor John A. Volpe, for his contributions to Transportation, the Town of Winchester, and
other fields.
The Volpe Memorial Working Group, shall keep records of their meetings, and keep a
spirit of relevant ad hoc, energetic membership, as would befit Governor Volpe.
of 3